Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF2317.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 2 TLSB 5045SV (1) 91 sb/js S.F. 2317 Section 1. Section 483A.24, subsection 17, Code 2026, is 1 amended to read as follows: 2 17. Upon payment of a fee established by rules adopted 3 pursuant to section 483A.1 of five dollars, and any processing 4 fee, for a lifetime fur harvester license, the department shall 5 issue a lifetime fur harvester license to a resident of Iowa 6 who has served in the armed forces of the United States on 7 federal active duty and who was disabled during that veteranâs 8 military service. The department shall prepare an application 9 to be used by a person requesting a lifetime fur harvester 10 license under this subsection . The department of veterans 11 affairs shall assist the department in verifying the status or 12 claims of applicants under this subsection . As used in this 13 subsection , âdisabledâ means entitled to a service connected 14 rating under 38 U.S.C. ch. 11. 15